apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
    <pardef n="जा__vblex_iv">
      <e>       <p><l>जाऊँगा</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाएँगे</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाऊँगी</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाएँगी</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाएगा</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाओगे</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाएगी</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाओगी</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाएगा</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाएँगे</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाएगी</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाएँगी</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जानेवाला</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जानेवाले</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जानेवाली</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जानेवाली</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाना</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाने</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाऊँ</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाएँ</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाओ</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाएँ</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाए</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाएँ</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाइए</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जा</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाओ</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाता</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जातें</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाती</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जातीं</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाकर</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाके</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>गया</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>गए</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>गई</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>गईं</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

 
    <!-- SECTION: Determiners -->       
    
    <pardef n="एक__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
         
    <pardef n="मेरी__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
        
    <pardef n="उस__det">
      <e><p><l>े</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>के</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
                <e><p><l>के</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>का</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>की</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
         <e><p><l>ने</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ना</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>नी</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Postpositions -->      

    <pardef n="ने__post">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="post"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <pardef n="/का__post">
      <e><p><l>का</l><r>का<s n="post"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>के</l><r>का<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>के</l><r>का<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>के</l><r>का<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>की</l><r>का<s n="post"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>की</l><r>का<s n="post"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>की</l><r>का<s n="post"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>की</l><r>का<s n="post"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTIN: Pronouns -->
                

    <pardef n="म/ैं__prn">
      <e><p><l>ैं</l><r>ैं<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ेरा</l><r>ैं<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ेरी</l><r>ैं<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>	
      <e><p><l>ुझे</l><r>ैं<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ुझको</l><r>ैं<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ैंने</l><r>ैं<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ुझ</l><r>ैं<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	
	 <pardef n="त/ैं__prn">
      <e><p><l>ुम</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ेरा</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ेरी</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>	
      <e><p><l>ुझे</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ुझको</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ुमने</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ुझ</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ुम्हें</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ुम्हारा</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ुम्हारी</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ुम्हारे</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	  
    </pardef> 
    
    

    <e lm="का"><i></i><par n="/का__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ने" c="nē (erg)"><i>ने</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="को" c="ko (dat)"><i>को</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="में" c="mēṁ (loc)"><i>में</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="पर" c="para ('on')"><i>पर</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="लिए"><i>लिए</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="से"><i>से</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ओर"><i>ओर</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="कोई"><i>कोई</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="द्वारा"><i>द्वारा</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के लिये"><i>के<b/>लिये</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के लिये"><i>के<b/>लिये</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के द्वारा"><i>के<b/>द्वारा</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के सामने"><i>के<b/>सामने</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के नीचे"><i>के<b/>नीचे</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के पीछे"><i>के<b/>पीछे</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के साथ"><i>के<b/>साथ</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के पास"><i>के<b/>पास</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="एक"><i>एक</i><par n="एक__det"/></e>
    <e lm="मेरी"><i>मेरी</i><par n="मेरी__det"/></e>
    <e lm="मेरा"><i>मेरा</i><par n="मेरी__det"/></e>
    <e lm="मेरे"><i>मेरे</i><par n="मेरी__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उस"><i>उस</i><par n="उस__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उन"><i>उन</i><par n="उस__det"/></e>
    <e lm="आप"><i>आप</i><par n="उस__det"/></e>
    <e lm="अप"><i>अप</i><par n="उस__det"/></e>
    <e lm="मैं"><i>म</i><par n="म/ैं__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="तुम"><i>त</i><par n="त/ैं__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="जा"><i></i><par n="जा__vblex_iv"/></e>
